Missouri, session 2026, HB3387.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 487.020, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 487.020, to read as follows:
487.020. 1. In each circuit or a county having a family court, a majority of the circuit
and associate circuit judges en banc, in the circuit, may appoint commissioners, subject to
appropriations, to hear family court cases and make findings as provided for in sections
487.010 to 487.190. Any person serving as a commissioner of the juvenile division of the
circuit court on August 28, 1993, shall become a commissioner of the family court. In each
circuit or a county therein having a family court, a majority of the circuit and associate circuit
judges en banc may appoint, in addition to those commissioners serving as commissioners of
the juvenile division and becoming commissioners of the family court pursuant to the
provisions of sections 487.020 to 487.040, no more than three additional commissioners to
hear family court cases and make findings and recommendations as provided in sections
487.010 to 487.190. The number of additional commissioners added as a result of the
provisions of sections 487.010 to 487.190 may be appointed only to the extent that the state is
reimbursed for the salaries of the commissioners as provided in sections 487.010 to 487.190
or by federal or county funds or by gifts or grants made for such purposes. A commissioner
shall be appointed for a term of four years. Commissioners appointed pursuant to sections
487.020 to 487.040 shall serve in addition to circuit judges, associate circuit court judges and
commissioners authorized to hear actions classified under section 487.080.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3387 2
2. The circuit courts in the seventh judicial circuit, eleventh judicial circuit, the
thirteenth judicial circuit, and the thirty-first judicial circuit may, in substitution of each
family court commissioner currently appointed pursuant to this section whose salary is
reimbursable, appoint a family court commissioner whose compensation shall be payable by
the state without necessity of reimbursement. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to allow appointment of a family court commissioner in the eleventh judicial circuit
in addition to the number of such family court commissioners holding office in the eleventh
judicial circuit as of January 1, 1999. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed
to allow appointment of a family court commissioner in the thirteenth judicial circuit or the
thirty-first judicial circuit in addition to the number of such family court commissioners
holding office in such circuits as of January 1, 2013. The provisions of this subsection shall
not be construed to allow appointment of a family court commissioner in the seventh
judicial circuit in addition to the number of such family court commissioners holding
office in the seventh judicial circuit as of January 1, 2027. The appointment of the state-
paid commissioner shall be subject to appropriations for such purpose.
3. Each commissioner of the family court shall possess the same qualifications as a
circuit judge. The compensation and retirement benefits of each commissioner shall be the
same as that of an associate circuit judge, payable in the same manner and from the same
source as that of an associate circuit judge.
✔